Illinois, session 104th, HB3483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Paid 5Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program Act. 6    Section 5. Declaration of policy and intent. 7    (a) Many employees do not have access to family and 8medical leave programs. Those who do may not be in a financial 9position to take family and medical leave that is unpaid, and 10employer-paid benefits that are available may meet only a 11relatively small part of this need. Therefore, it is the 12public policy of this State to protect working families 13against the economic hardship caused by the need to take time 14off from work for reasons such as caring for themselves or 15family members who are suffering from serious illness or 16caring for a newborn or a newly adopted child. Moreover, many 17women are single mothers or the primary breadwinners for their 18families. If any of these women take unpaid maternity leave, 19their families and Illinois suffer. However, the United States 20is the only industrialized nation in the world that does not 21have a mandatory workplace-based program for such income 22support. It is, therefore, desirable and necessary to develop 23systems that help families adapt to the competing interests of   HB3483- 2 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1work and home and that not only benefit workers but also 2benefit employers by reducing employee turnover and increasing 3worker productivity.4    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a 5paid family and medical leave insurance program to relieve 6this serious menace to the health, morals, and welfare of 7Illinois families, to increase workplace productivity, and to 8alleviate the enormous and growing stress on working families 9of balancing the demands of work and family needs. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Assisted reproduction" means a method of achieving a 12pregnancy through the handling of human oocytes, sperm, 13zygotes, or embryos for the purpose of establishing a 14pregnancy. "Assisted reproduction" includes, but is not 15limited to, methods of artificial insemination, in vitro 16fertilization, embryo transfer, zygote transfer, embryo 17biopsy, preimplantation genetic diagnosis, embryo 18cryopreservation, oocyte donation, gamete donation, zygote 19donation, embryo donation, and gestational surrogacy.20    "Average weekly wage" means one-thirteenth of the wages 21paid during the quarter with the highest earnings earned in 22the 4 quarters prior to the last day before taking paid family 23and medical leave. For purposes of calculating average weekly 24wage, "wages" include, but are not limited to, salary, 25earnings, gratuities, bonuses, commissions, and any other   HB3483- 3 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1compensation that constitutes remuneration as determined by 2the Department by rule.3    "Care" includes, but is not limited to, physical care, 4emotional support, visitation, arranging for a change in care, 5assistance with essential daily living matters, and personal 6attendant services.7    "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, 8stepchild, or ward of a covered individual, a child of a spouse 9of the covered individual, a child of a parent, a child of a 10civil union partner of the covered individual, or a person 11whose close relationship with the covered individual is the 12equivalent of a family relationship. 13    "Civil union" has the meaning set forth in Section 10 of 14the Illinois Religious Freedom Protection and Civil Union Act.15    "Consecutive leave" means leave that is taken without 16interruption based upon an employee's regular work schedule 17and does not include breaks in employment in which an employee 18is not regularly scheduled to work.19    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 20reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 21refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 22fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 23painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 24from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 25bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 26waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other   HB3483- 4 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1structure, project, development, real property, or 2improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether the 3performance of the work herein described involves the addition 4to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 5real property, or improvement herein described of any material 6or article of merchandise. "Construction industry" also 7includes moving construction related materials on the job site 8or to or from the job site, snow plowing, snow removal, and 9refuse collection.10    "Covered individual" means either an employee who meets 11the financial eligibility requirements described in subsection 12(f) of Section 20 or a self-employed individual who has 13elected coverage under Section 25 and who is seeking or has 14been approved for paid family and medical leave benefits under 15this Act.16    "Day and temporary labor service agency" has the meaning 17set forth in Section 5 of the Day and Temporary Labor Services 18Act.19    "Department" means the Department of Labor.20    "Director" means the Director of Labor.21    "Deputy Director" means the Deputy Director of the 22Division of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance 23Program.24    "Division" means the Division of Paid Family and Medical 25Leave. 26    "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as provided in   HB3483- 5 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.2    "Domestic work" has the meaning set forth in Section 10 of 3the Domestic Workers' Bill of Rights Act.4    "Domestic worker" has the meaning set forth in Section 10 5of the Domestic Workers' Bill of Rights Act. "Domestic worker" 6also includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 7partnerships who engage in domestic work.8    "Employee" means an individual who is or has been employed 9by any combination of employers in the State of Illinois. An 10employee is considered to be employed in the State of Illinois 11if the employee works in Illinois or the employee routinely 12performs some work in Illinois and the employee's base of 13operations or the place from which the work is directed and 14controlled is in Illinois. "Employee" includes domestic 15workers. "Employee" does not include an employee as defined in 16the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 17et seq.) or the Federal Employers' Liability Act (45 U.S.C. 51 18et seq.).19    "Employ" means to suffer or permit to work.20    "Employer" means any person, partnership, association, 21trust, estate, joint-stock company, insurance company, or 22corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, 23trustee in bankruptcy, or trustee that has in its employ one or 24more employees performing services for it within this State. 25"Employer" includes any employer subject to the Unemployment 26Insurance Act. "Employer" also includes a day and temporary   HB3483- 6 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1labor service agency that provides employees on a temporary 2basis to its customers.3    "Employment benefits" means all benefits provided or made 4available to employees by an employer, including, but not 5limited to, life insurance, health insurance, disability 6insurance, sick leave, annual or vacation leave, paid time 7off, paid or unpaid leave, educational benefits, pensions, and 8any other employment benefit required by federal, State, or 9local law.10    "Family member" means an employee's child, spouse, party 11to a civil union, parent, or any other individual related by 12blood, marriage, or civil union or whose close relationship 13with the employee is the equivalent of a family relationship.14    "Family and medical leave benefits" means any payments 15that are payable to a covered individual for all or part of a 16period of paid family and medical leave.17    "Health care provider" means any person licensed under 18federal, State, or local law to provide health care services 19or any other person who has been authorized to provide health 20care by a licensed health care provider or any other 21individual determined by the Department to be capable of 22providing health care services.23    "Interested party" means an organization that monitors or 24is attentive to compliance with public or worker safety laws, 25wage and hour requirements, or other statutory requirements.26    "Intermittent leave" means a nonconsecutive leave   HB3483- 7 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1consisting of a minimum interval of no more than 2 hours, as 2set by the Department, within a consecutive 12-month period 3that begins with the first day that the covered individual 4first establishes the claim.5    "Medical procedure" means a course of action intended to 6achieve a result in the delivery of health care.7    "Miscarriage" means the loss of a pregnancy before 20 8weeks of gestation.9    "Parent" means a biological parent, foster parent, 10adoptive parent, or stepparent, or a person who was a legal 11guardian of, or who stood in loco parentis to, an individual 12when the individual was a child, or any other person whose 13close association with the individual is the equivalent of a 14parent.15    "Placement for adoption" means the time when an individual 16adopts a child or becomes a caregiver for a child pending 17adoption by an individual.18    "Reproductive health care" means health care offered, 19arranged, or furnished for the purpose of preventing 20pregnancy, terminating a pregnancy, managing pregnancy loss, 21or improving maternal health and birth outcomes. "Reproductive 22health care" includes, but is not limited to, contraception, 23sterilization, preconception care, assisted reproduction, 24maternity care, abortion care, and counseling regarding 25reproductive health care.26    "Self-employed individual" means an individual who   HB3483- 8 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1receives self-employment income as defined in Section 1402(b) 2of the Internal Revenue Code.3    "Serious health condition" means an illness, injury, 4impairment, or physical or mental condition that requires 5inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical 6care facility or continuing medical treatment or continuing 7supervision by a health care provider.8    "Sexual assault" means any conduct proscribed by: (i) 9Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except Sections 11-35 10and 11-45; or (ii) Section 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 1112-16 of the Criminal Code of 2012.12    "Stalking" means any conduct proscribed by Section 12-7.3, 1312-7.4, or 12-7.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.14    "Statewide average weekly wage" means the wage determined 15by the Department of Employment Security pursuant to paragraph 16(2) of subsection (B) of Part (I) of Section 401 of the 17Unemployment Insurance Act.18    "Stillbirth" means the loss of a pregnancy at 20 weeks of 19gestation or later.20    "Victim" means an individual who has been subjected to 21domestic or sexual violence.22    "Victim services organization" means a nonprofit, 23nongovernmental organization that provides assistance to 24victims of domestic or sexual violence, including rape crisis 25centers, organizations carrying out a domestic violence 26program, organizations operating a shelter or providing   HB3483- 9 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1counseling services, or a legal services organization or other 2organization providing assistance through the legal process.3    "Wages" means any remuneration owed an individual as a 4result of employment, an employment contract or agreement 5between 2 or more parties or a contract for services, whether 6paid directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to, 7salaries, commissions, gratuities, stock options, and bonuses, 8and reasonable cash value of board, rent, housing, lodging, 9payment in kind and all remuneration paid in any medium other 10than cash, and whether the amount is determined on a time, 11task, piece, or any other basis of calculation.12    "Weekly benefit amount" means the amount of wage 13replacement paid to a covered individual on a weekly basis 14while the covered individual is on paid family and medical 15leave as provided in Section 40. 16    Section 15. Division of Paid Family and Medical Leave. 17    (a) There is created a Division of Paid Family and Medical 18Leave within the Department of Labor under the supervision and 19control of the Director.20    (b) The Department shall name a Deputy Director of the 21Division of Paid Family and Medical Leave and hire other 22persons as necessary to discharge the requirements of this 23Act. The Deputy Director shall have the powers delegated to 24him or her by the Director, in addition to the powers set forth 25in this Act.  HB3483- 10 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (c) The Department shall establish procedures and forms 2for filing claims for benefits under this Act.3    (d) The Department shall use information sharing and 4integration technology to facilitate the disclosure of 5relevant information or records by the Department.6    (e) Information contained in the files and records 7pertaining to an employee, self-employed individual, or any 8other individual who submits files and records under this Act 9is confidential and not open to public inspection under the 10Freedom of Information Act, other than to public employees in 11the performance of their official duties. An employer must 12keep at its place of business records of employment from which 13the information needed by the Department for purposes of this 14Act may be obtained. The records shall at all times be open to 15the inspection of the Department in accordance with rules 16adopted by the Department.17    (f) The Division shall develop and implement an outreach 18program to ensure that individuals who may be eligible to 19receive paid family and medical leave benefits under this Act 20are made aware of these benefits. Outreach information shall 21explain, in an easy-to-understand format, eligibility 22requirements, the claims process, weekly benefit amounts, 23maximum benefits payable, notice requirements, reinstatement 24and nondiscrimination rights, confidentiality, and 25coordination of leave under this Act and other laws, 26collective bargaining agreements, and employer policies.   HB3483- 11 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1Outreach information shall be available in English and in 2languages other than English that are spoken as a primary 3language by a significant portion of the State's population, 4as determined by the Department.5    (g) Any local, county, or municipal ordinance or policy 6that provides for paid family and medical leave benefits for 7the employees of that local unit of government, or any workers 8or employers within its jurisdiction, must comply with the 9requirements of this Act or provide benefits, rights, and 10remedies that are greater than or equal to the benefits, 11rights, and remedies afforded under this Act. 12    Section 17. Claims for paid family and medical leave. A 13claim for paid family and medical leave may be taken by a 14covered individual from work:15        (1) to participate in the providing of care, including 16    physical or psychological care, for a family member which 17    was made necessary by a serious health condition or 18    medical procedure of the family member;19        (2) to be with a child during the first 12 months after 20    the child's birth if the covered individual is a family 21    member of the child, the first 12 months after the 22    placement of the child for adoption or foster care with 23    the covered individual, the first 12 months after the 24    child becomes a ward, the first 12 months after in loco 25    parentis status of the child is acquired, or the first 12   HB3483- 12 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    months after the establishment of parentage under the 2    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 if the child is 17 years of 3    age or younger. As used in this paragraph, "child" also 4    includes any individual who is less than 18 years of age or 5    any individual who is 18 years of age or older but is 6    incapable of self-care because of medical needs or a 7    mental or physical impairment;8        (3) for the covered individual's own serious health 9    condition, including, but not limited to, stillbirth or 10    miscarriage or other conditions in connection with 11    pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, related conditions 12    even though the covered individual does not receive 13    treatment from a health care provider during the absence, 14    including, but not limited to, absence due to morning 15    sickness, a physical limitation arising from pregnancy, or 16    exposure to chemicals or hazardous material that may be 17    harmful, or any other related condition;18        (4) for the covered individual's own reproductive 19    health care;20        (5) because the covered individual's or the covered 21    individual's family member is the victim of domestic or 22    sexual violence and the covered individual requests leave 23    because the victim is: (i) experiencing or has experienced 24    an incident of or ongoing domestic or sexual violence; 25    (ii) seeking medical attention for, or recovering from, 26    physical, emotional, or psychological injuries caused by   HB3483- 13 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    domestic or sexual violence; (iii) obtaining services from 2    a victim services organization; (iv) obtaining 3    psychological or other counseling; (v) participating in 4    safety planning, temporarily or permanently relocating, or 5    taking other actions to increase the safety of the victim 6    or the victim's family members from future domestic or 7    sexual violence to ensure safety or economic security; or 8    (vi) seeking legal assistance or remedies to ensure the 9    health and safety of the victim or the victim's family 10    members, including preparing for or participating in any 11    civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or derived 12    from domestic or sexual violence; and13        (6) because of any qualifying exigency as interpreted 14    under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 15    2612(a)(1)(E) and 29 CFR 825.126) arising out of the fact 16    that a family member is on active duty in the Armed Forces 17    of the United States.18    As used in this Act, "paid family and medical leave" does 19not include any period of time during which a covered 20individual is paid benefits under the Workers' Compensation 21Act, the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, or the 22Unemployment Insurance Act because the covered individual is 23unable to perform the duties of the covered individual's 24employment due to the covered individual's own disability. 25    Section 20. Eligibility for benefits; certification.   HB3483- 14 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (a) The Department may require that a claim for paid 2family and medical leave benefits under this Section be 3supported by a certification.4        (1) For a claim for paid family and medical leave 5    under paragraph (1) or (3) of Section 17, the 6    certification shall be sufficient if it is issued by a 7    health care provider of the covered individual's choosing 8    who is providing care to the covered individual or the 9    covered individual's family member, as applicable, and the 10    need for intermittent leave, if applicable; however, the 11    Department may require suitable alternative documentation 12    where it is impractical or impossible to acquire 13    certification from a health care provider. 14        (2) For a claim under paragraph (2) or (4) of Section 15    17, leave shall be granted without certification.16        (3) For a claim under paragraph (5) of Section 17, any 17    one of the following documents is acceptable for 18    certification and only one of the documents shall be 19    required: a police report, a court document, a document 20    issued by a healthcare provider, or a signed statement 21    from an attorney, a member of the clergy, or a victim 22    services organization or advocate. It is up to the covered 23    individual to determine which documentation to submit. If 24    documentation has been submitted, the Department or the 25    employer shall not request or require any other 26    documentation if the reason for the initial or subsequent   HB3483- 15 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    claim for paid family and medical leave is related to the 2    same incident of violence or the same perpetrator of the 3    violence. The Department may require alternative 4    documentation where it is impractical or impossible to 5    acquire certification from the listed documents in this 6    paragraph.7        (4) For a claim under paragraph (6) of Section 17, one 8    of the following documents is acceptable for 9    certification: a copy of the family member's active duty 10    orders, other documentation issued by the U.S. Armed 11    Forces, or other documentation permitted by the 12    Department.13    (b) If an employer provides paid or unpaid leave, the 14employee may elect whether first to use the paid or unpaid 15leave or to receive paid family and medical leave benefits 16under this Act. An employee may not be required to use paid or 17unpaid leave provided by the employer if leave is provided by 18federal, State, or local law.19    (c) This Section does not limit an employee's right to 20take leave from employment under other laws or employer 21policy.22    (d) The eligibility of an individual for benefits is not 23affected by a strike or lockout at the factory, establishment, 24or other premises at which the individual is or was last 25employed.26    (e) An employee who has received benefits under this   HB3483- 16 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1Section may not lose any other employment benefits, including 2seniority or pension rights, accrued before the date that paid 3family and medical leave commenced. This Section does not 4entitle an employee to accrue employment benefits during a 5period of paid family and medical leave or to a right, benefit, 6or position of employment other than a right, benefit, or 7position to which the employee would have been entitled had 8the employee not taken paid family and medical leave.9    (f) Subject to the requirements of this Act, an individual 10shall be eligible to receive benefits under this Act if that 11individual has been paid during the individual's base period 12wages equal to not less than $1,600, provided that the 13individual has been paid wages equal to at least $440 during 14that part of the individual's base period which does not 15include the calendar quarter in which the wages paid to the 16individual were highest. "Base period" means the first 4 of 17the last 5 completed calendar quarters immediately preceding 18the Sunday immediately preceding the first day that family and 19medical leave under this Act commences for the covered 20individual. If an individual is not eligible to receive paid 21family and medical leave benefits or an individual's weekly 22benefit amount would be lower using the base period, a base 23period consisting of the last 4 completed quarters immediately 24preceding the Sunday immediately preceding the first day that 25paid family and medical leave under this Act commences shall 26be used to establish eligibility or a higher weekly benefit   HB3483- 17 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1amount for the covered individual.2    (g) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to interfere with, 3impede, or in any way diminish the right of individuals to 4bargain collectively with their employers through 5representatives of their own choosing in order to establish 6wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable 7minimum standards established in this Act. The paid family and 8medical leave requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona 9fide collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver 10is set forth explicitly in the agreement in clear and 11unambiguous terms and the employer offers an approved 12equivalent plan under Section 50.13    (h) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to affect the 14validity or change the terms of bona fide collective 15bargaining agreements in force on the effective date of this 16Act. After that date, the requirements of this Act may be 17waived in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, but 18only in accordance with subsection (g).19    (i) This Section does not create a continuing entitlement 20or contractual right.21    (j) Nothing in the Section shall limit the eligibility of 22an employee for benefits upon the change of employment as long 23as the employee remains an employee or has been employed by any 24employer in the State of Illinois within the 2 quarters 25preceding his or her submission of a claim for paid family and 26medical leave.   HB3483- 18 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    Section 25. Self-employed benefits. 2    (a) For benefits payable beginning January 1, 2028, any 3self-employed individual may elect to be covered under this 4Act. The self-employed individual must file a notice of 5election in writing with the Department and contribute to the 6Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program Fund as 7described in Section 35. The self-employed individual must 8agree to supply any information concerning taxable income that 9the Department deems necessary. After the election is 10processed by the Department, the self-employed individual must 11begin submitting payroll deductions as an employee and an 12employer required under Section 35 for a minimum period of 3 13years. In order to be eligible to receive benefits under this 14Act, the self-employed individual must satisfy the financial 15eligibility requirements of subsection (f) of Section 20 and 16have submitted payroll deductions as an employee as required 17under Section 35 for a minimum of 3 months preceding any claim 18for leave under this Act.19    (b) A self-employed individual who has elected to be 20covered may terminate coverage by filing written notice with 21the Department as prescribed by rule only upon a bona fide 22change in the employment status of the self-employed 23individual or as described under subsection (c). The 24termination may not take effect sooner than 30 days after the 25notice is filed and may not be filed while the self-employed   HB3483- 19 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1individual is on leave approved under this Act. If termination 2is permitted, the Department may waive the requirements in 3subsection (a) that a self-employed individual submit payroll 4deductions as an employee and employer for a minimum period of 53 years. Once a self-employed individual terminates coverage, 6the individual shall be disqualified from seeking another 7election of coverage as a self-employed individual for a 8period of 2 years unless he or she can demonstrate a bona fide 9change in employment status resulting in the need for a 10subsequent election within those 2 years.11    (c) A self-employed individual who has elected to be 12covered may terminate coverage based upon the filing of a 13voluntary or involuntary bankruptcy petition. The elective 14coverage of a self-employed individual terminates on the date 15the self-employed individual provides written notice and 16documentation to the Department to support the bankruptcy 17petition filing of the self-employed individual. 18    Section 30. Disqualification from benefits. 19    (a) A covered individual is disqualified from paid family 20and medical leave benefits under this Act if the covered 21individual willfully makes a false statement to obtain 22benefits.23    (b) A disqualification for paid family and medical leave 24benefits is for a period of 2 years, and commences on the first 25day of the calendar week in which the covered individual filed   HB3483- 20 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1a claim for benefits under this Act. A covered individual who 2is disqualified for benefits is liable to the Department for a 3penalty in an amount equal to 15% of the amount of benefits 4received by the covered individual. 5    Section 35. Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance 6Program Fund. 7    (a) The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program 8Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 9Fund shall be separated into 2 accounts, one for the 10administration of this Act and one for the payment of paid 11family and medical leave benefits under this Act. All interest 12that accrues on moneys in the Fund shall be credited to the 13Fund. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an 14employer from providing additional voluntary employer 15contributions toward the cost of benefits provided under this 16Act. These voluntary contributions may be in addition to 17employee payroll deductions or used to replace in whole or in 18part employee payroll deductions.19    (b) The Department shall by rule provide for the 20collection of premium contributions. The amount of the premium 21contribution imposed under this Section, less refunds 22authorized by this Act, and all assessments and penalties 23collected under this Act shall be deposited into and credited 24to the Fund.25        (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the combined premium   HB3483- 21 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    contribution shall be 1.12% of wages.2        (2) At no time shall the combined premium contribution 3    be greater than 1.25% of wages.4        (3) Beginning January 1, 2027, an employer shall 5    retain from all employees a payroll premium deduction in 6    the amount of 40% of the total premium contribution amount 7    established by the actuarial analysis as a percentage of 8    wages for all employees and an employer with 25 or more 9    employees shall pay the remaining 60% of the premium 10    contribution.11        (4) Beginning January 1, 2029, an employer shall 12    retain from all employees a payroll premium deduction in 13    the amount of 40% of the total premium contribution amount 14    established by the actuarial analysis as a percentage of 15    wages for all employees and an employer with one or more 16    employees shall pay the remaining 60% of the premium 17    contribution. No employee shall be required to pay a 18    higher percentage premium than any other employee.19        (5) Beginning January 1, 2028, and each calendar year 20    thereafter, not later than October 1 of the prior year, 21    the Department shall set the premium contribution rate for 22    the coming calendar year at the rate necessary to obtain a 23    total amount of contributions equal to 135% of the 24    benefits paid during the previous fiscal year plus an 25    amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the 26    payment of those benefits during the previous fiscal year,   HB3483- 22 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    less the amount of net assets remaining in the Fund as of 2    June 30 of the current calendar year.3        (6) Premium contributions shall not be assessed on the 4    first $15,000 of a covered individual's wages.5        (7) Premium contributions shall not be assessed on a 6    covered individual's wages that exceed $352,200 or 2 times 7    the Social Security contribution and benefit base, as 8    determined under 42 U.S.C. 430, whichever is greater.9    (c) A Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program 10Advisory Board is established as an advisory board to the 11Department of Labor. The Advisory Board shall advise the 12Department in planning for, implementing, and evaluating the 13Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program to ensure that 14all eligible Illinois workers can afford to participate in the 15program and take leave as necessary, while considering the 16impact on Illinois employers. The Advisory Board shall 17continuously evaluate the program to determine what barriers 18to access or other inequities may exist within its 19administration, including evaluating program uptake to ensure 20low-income and middle-income workers are participating in the 21program. The Advisory Board shall make recommendations for 22improvements to the program, as appropriate, including, but 23not limited to, the appropriate and sustainable number of 24weeks of leave allowed, the rates of wage replacement and 25premium contributions, and any recommended wage exemptions or 26caps.  HB3483- 23 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (d) The Advisory Board shall include and represent the 2diversity of workers, business, self-employed individuals, and 3advocacy organizations in Illinois. No later than January 1, 42027, the Governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent 5of the Senate, members to the Advisory Board as follows:6        (1) 4 employees of businesses in this State or members 7    of an organization representing employees in this State;8        (2) 4 owners of businesses in this State; and9        (3) one member of the public who resides in this 10    State.11    (e) The Director shall annually, on or before March 1, 12report in writing to the Advisory Board concerning the 13deposits into and expenditures from this State's account in 14the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program Fund. The 15Advisory Board shall meet at least once per quarter. The 16Advisory Board shall hold time for public comment at every 17meeting. The members shall serve without compensation but are 18entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses.19    (f) The Department may adjust rates, not to exceed the 20amount established in subsection (b), for the collection of 21premiums as described in subsection (c). The Department shall 22set rates for premiums and deductions in a manner that 23minimizes the volatility of the rates assessed and so that at 24the end of the period for which the rates are effective, the 25cash balance shall be an amount approximating 12 months of 26projected expenditures from the Fund, considering the   HB3483- 24 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1functions and duties of the Department under this Act. 2    Section 40. Compensation for paid family and medical 3leave. 4    (a) A covered individual's weekly benefit rate shall be 590% of his or her average weekly wage, subject to a maximum of 6the statewide average weekly wage paid to workers by 7employers; however, the covered individual's benefit rate 8shall be computed to the next lower multiple of $1 if not 9already a multiple thereof. The amount of benefits for each 10day of paid family and medical leave for which benefits are 11payable shall be one-fifth of the corresponding weekly benefit 12amount; however, the total benefits for a fractional part of a 13week shall be computed to the next lower multiple of $1 if not 14already a multiple thereof. The first payment of benefits must 15be made to a covered individual within 14 calendar days after 16the claim is filed and there is sufficient information to 17approve at least one week of benefits; subsequent payments 18must be made no later than semi-monthly thereafter.19    (b) With respect to any period of paid family and medical 20leave and while an individual is a covered individual, family 21and medical leave benefits not in excess of the covered 22individual's maximum benefits shall be payable with respect to 23the first day of leave taken. The maximum total benefits 24payable to any covered individual within a covered base year 25shall be 18 times the covered individual's weekly benefit   HB3483- 25 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1amount; however, the maximum amount shall be computed in the 2next lower multiple of $1 if not already a multiple thereof.3    (c) The maximum weekly benefit for family and medical 4leave that occurs on or after January 1, 2028 shall be $1,200. 5By September 30, 2029, and by September 30 of each year 6thereafter, the maximum weekly benefit shall be adjusted to 7the State average weekly wage. The adjusted maximum weekly 8benefit amount takes effect on the following January 1.9    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit the 10establishment by an employer, without approval by the 11Department, of a supplementary plan or plans providing for the 12payment to employees, or to any class or classes of employees, 13of benefits in addition to the benefits provided by this Act or 14to prohibit the collection or receipt of voluntary 15contributions from employees toward the cost of the additional 16benefits. However, no employee shall be asked or required to 17contribute to any plan or plans, even on a voluntary basis, if 18the employee is not able to use or access the benefits for 19which they are contributing from the plan or plans. The 20rights, duties, and responsibilities of all interested parties 21under the supplementary plans shall be unaffected by any 22provision of this Act. 23    Section 45. Paid family and medical leave; duration. 24    (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a covered individual may 25take 18 weeks of paid family and medical leave within any   HB3483- 26 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b112-month period that begins with the first day that the 2covered employee first establishes the claim in order to 3provide care made necessary by reasons identified in Section 417. A covered individual may take paid family and medical 5leave on an intermittent schedule in which all leave 6authorized under this Act is not taken sequentially. A covered 7individual may take up to an additional 9 weeks of paid family 8and medical leave within any 12-month period that begins with 9the first day that the covered individual first establishes 10the claim for which the covered individual is eligible for 11leave taken in connection with pregnancy, recovery from 12childbirth, related conditions, or if the child of the covered 13individual was a patient in the neonatal intensive care unit.14    (b) The taking of leave intermittently or on a medically 15necessary periodic schedule under this Section shall not 16result in a reduction in the total amount of leave to which the 17covered individual is entitled under this Act. 18    Section 50. Employer equivalent plans. 19    (a) An employer, whether a private sector or public sector 20employer, may apply to the Division for approval of an 21employer-offered benefit plan that provides family and medical 22leave benefits to the employer's employees. In order to be 23approved, an employer-offered plan must confer all same 24rights, protections, and benefits provided to covered 25individuals under this Act, including, but not limited to, the   HB3483- 27 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1bases for leave, the duration of leave, the wage replacement 2rate, and the ability to appeal a denial for a claim for 3benefits. The equivalent plan shall not discriminate against 4any employee based on their wage or other compensation or the 5employee's job category or position.6    (b) If the plan is in the form of a third party that 7provides for insurance, the forms of the policy must be issued 8by an insurer approved by the State.9    (c) An employer that seeks approval of a plan shall submit 10an application to the Division in the form and manner and by 11the date prescribed by the Department by rule, accompanied by 12an application fee. The application fee shall be no less than 13$250 and no more than $1,000. The Department shall establish 14the criteria for the cost of application fees over $250, 15including, but not limited to, the number of the employees, 16employer earnings, and the time and resources the Department 17expends to assess employer-offered plans. An employer shall 18reapply for approval from the Division annually or whenever 19the employee's plan changes. The reapplication fee shall be no 20less than $150 and no more than $1,000. The Department shall 21establish the criteria for the cost of reapplication fees over 22$150, including, but not limited to, the number of employees, 23employer earnings, the time and resources the Department 24expends to assess reapplication of employer-offered plans, and 25the extent of changes to the plan.26    (d) The Division shall review and approve an application   HB3483- 28 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1for a plan if the Deputy Director finds that:2        (1) the plan is made available to all employees who 3    have been employed with an employer and meet the 4    definition of employee;5        (2) the benefits and rights afforded to employees 6    covered under the plan are equal to or greater than the 7    benefits and rights that an employee would qualify for 8    under this Act; and9        (3) the plan does not require an employee or 10    prospective employee, as a condition of employment, to 11    execute or renew a contract, agreement, clause, covenant, 12    waiver, or other document that prohibits or attempts to 13    prohibit employees from making statements or disclosures 14    regarding an employer's equivalency plan, as long as the 15    statements or disclosures are not known to be false by the 16    employee or prospective employee. No contract, agreement, 17    clause, covenant, waiver, or other document shall 18    prohibit, prevent, or otherwise restrict an employee, 19    prospective employee, or former employee from reporting 20    any allegations of unlawful conduct under this Act and 21    participating in any investigation or hearings conducted 22    by the Department or any court.23    If the plan is in the form of self-insurance, the employer 24must furnish a bond to the Department with a surety company 25authorized to transact business in this State in the form, 26amount, and manner required by the Department.  HB3483- 29 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (e) Once an application is approved, beginning January 1 2of the following year, neither the employer nor an employee 3covered under an employer plan is subject to the requirements 4of this Act or required to make the contributions or 5deductions as described in Section 35. 6    (f) An employer shall assume all costs related to a plan 7approved under this Section and shall not deduct contributions 8from the wages of employees or in any manner have employees pay 9for the plan.10    (g) An employer that offers a plan approved under this 11Section shall:12        (1) maintain all reports, information, and records 13    relating to the plan, including payroll and account 14    records that document employee contributions and expenses, 15    in the manner established by the Department by rule; and16        (2) provide written notice annually to employees that 17    includes:18            (A) information about benefits available under the 19        approved plan, including the duration of leave;20            (B) the process for filing a claim to receive 21        benefits under the plan;22            (C) the right to job protection and benefits 23        continuation; and24            (D) a statement that discrimination and 25        retaliatory actions against an employee for inquiring 26        about the paid family and medical leave insurance   HB3483- 30 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1        program established under this Act, giving 2        notification of leave under the program, taking leave 3        under the program, or claiming paid family and medical 4        leave benefits are prohibited.5    (h) Each quarter, employers who have received approval for 6an employer-offered plan under this Section must report to the 7Division the number of claims for benefits the employer 8received, the number of claims that were denied and the bases 9for those denials, and the number of claims that were 10approved. In addition, for all denials and approvals of 11claims, employers shall report the number of denials and 12approvals as distributed by gender, race, ethnicity, wages, 13and any other demographic factors determined to be relevant by 14the Department.15    (i) The Division may investigate an employer-offered plan 16approved under this Section for violations of this Act based 17upon a complaint submitted by an employee subject to the plan, 18an interested party, or evidence of a pattern and practice of 19denials based upon the date submitted by the employer in 20subsection (h) of this Section. 21    (j) Where the Division finds an employer-offered plan has 22been administered inconsistently with its approval, the 23Department may withdraw approval for an employer-offered plan 24granted under this Section. An employer who has had its 25approval for an employer-offered plan withdrawn under this 26Section shall be subject to an additional penalty contribution   HB3483- 31 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1rate equivalent to 50% of the standard contribution rate 2assigned to an employer under Section 35 for a period of time 3to be determined by the Department, not to exceed 2 years. 4Causes for plan termination shall include, but not be limited 5to, the following: 6        (1) failure to pay benefits to eligible employees; 7        (2) failure to pay benefits timely and in a manner 8    consistent with this Act; 9        (3) failure to maintain reports and provide notice 10    under subsection (g) or submit the required data under 11    subsection (h) or comply with other compliance 12    requirements as required by the Deputy Director or the 13    Department by rule; or 14        (4) failure to comply with this Act or the rules 15    adopted in accordance with this Act. 16    (k) An employer may be subjected to penalties under 17Section 70 if the employer fails to maintain an approved 18equivalency plan or provide benefits to employees under an 19approved equivalency plan that are inconsistent with this Act.20    (l) An interested party or person aggrieved by a violation 21of this Section by an employer may file suit in circuit court 22in the county where the alleged offense occurred or where any 23person who is party to the action resides, without regard to 24exhaustion of any alternative administrative remedies provided 25in this Act. Actions may be brought by one or more persons for 26and on behalf of themselves and other persons similarly   HB3483- 32 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1situated. A person whose rights have been violated under this 2Section by an employer is entitled to collect:3        (1) the amount of any wages, salary, employment 4    benefits, or other compensation denied or lost to the 5    person by reason of the violation, plus an equal amount in 6    liquidated damages;7        (2) compensatory damages and an amount up to $500 for 8    each violation of this Act or any rule adopted under this 9    Act;10        (3) in the case of unlawful retaliation, all legal or 11    equitable relief as may be appropriate; and 12        (4) attorney's fees and costs. 13    The right of an interested party or aggrieved person to 14bring an action under this Section terminates upon the passing 15of 3 years from the date of the alleged violation or, for a 16series of violations, the last date in which a violation 17occurred. This limitations period is tolled if an employer has 18deterred a person's exercise of rights under this Section. 19    Section 55. Annual reports; contents. 20    (a) The Department shall issue and make available to the 21public, not later than January 1, 2029 and each January 1 22thereafter, annual reports providing data on paid family and 23medical leave benefits, whether provided through the 24State-operated program or through employer equivalent plans as 25described in Section 50, including separate data for each of   HB3483- 33 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1the paid family and medical leave categories described in 2Section 17. The reports shall include, for each category of 3claims, the number of workers receiving the benefits, the 4amount of benefits paid, the average duration of benefits, the 5average weekly benefit, and any reported amount of paid leave, 6vacation, or other fully paid time which resulted in reduced 7benefit duration. The reports shall provide data by gender, 8race, ethnicity, wages, and any other demographic factors 9determined to be relevant by the Department. The reports shall 10also provide for: (i) all family and medical leave benefits, 11the total costs of benefits and the total cost of 12administration, the portion of benefits for claims during paid 13family and medical leave, and the total revenues from employer 14premium contributions, where applicable; (ii) employee 15assessments; and (iii) other sources. Any and all data made 16available to the public shall be de-identified and anonymized.17    (b) The Division may, in its discretion, conduct surveys 18and other research regarding, and include in the annual 19reports descriptions and evaluations of, the impact and 20potential future impact of the costs and benefits resulting 21from the provisions of this Act for:22        (1) employees and their families, including surveys 23    and evaluations of what portion of the total number of 24    employees taking leave would not have taken leave, or 25    would have taken less leave, without the availability of 26    benefits; what portion of employees return to work after   HB3483- 34 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    receiving benefits and what portion are not permitted to 2    return to work; and what portion of employees who are 3    eligible for benefits do not claim or receive them and why 4    they do not;5        (2) employers, including benefits such as reduced 6    training and other costs related to reduced turnover of 7    personnel, and increased affordability of paid family and 8    medical leave as provided pursuant to this Act, with 9    special attention given to small businesses; and10        (3) the public, including savings caused by any 11    reduction in the number of people receiving public 12    assistance.13    (c) The total amount of any expenses that the Department 14determines are necessary to carry out its duties described in 15this Section shall be charged to the administration account of 16the Fund. 17    Section 60. Hearings. A person aggrieved by a decision of 18the Department under this Act may request a hearing. The 19Department shall adopt rules governing hearings and the 20issuance of final orders under this Act in accordance with the 21Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. All final 22administrative decisions of the Department under this Act are 23subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 24Law.   HB3483- 35 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    Section 65. Prohibited acts; enforcement. 2    (a) No employer, day and temporary labor service agency, 3employee organization, or other person shall discharge, expel, 4or otherwise retaliate or discriminate against an individual 5because the individual has requested paid family and medical 6leave, attempted to claim paid family and medical leave 7benefits, taken paid family and medical leave, filed or 8communicated to the employer an intent to file a claim, a 9complaint, or an appeal, or has testified or is about to 10testify or has assisted in any proceeding, under this Act, at 11any time or the individual has spoken to any other individual 12for any reason about paid family and medical leave.13    (b) A person aggrieved by a violation of subsection (a) 14may file suit in circuit court in the county where the alleged 15offense occurred or where any person who is party to the action 16resides without regard to exhaustion of any alternative 17administrative remedies provided in this Act. Any employer 18that violates subsection (a) shall be liable to the individual 19who is affected by the violation for damages equal to the sum 20of disciplining, or counting paid leave under a no-fault 21attendance policy. Retaliation shall subject an employer to 22civil penalties under this Act as follows:23        (1) the amount of:24            (A) any wages, salary, employment benefits, or 25        other compensation denied or lost to the individual by 26        reason of the violation; or  HB3483- 36 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1            (B) in a case in which wages, salary, employment 2        benefits, or other compensation have not been denied 3        or lost to the individual, any actual monetary losses 4        sustained by the individual as a direct violation, 5        such as the cost of providing care, up to a sum equal 6        to 60 calendar days of wages or salary for the 7        individual; and8        (2) the interest on the amount described under 9    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) calculated at the 10    prevailing rate; and11        (3) an additional amount as liquidated damages equal 12    to the sum of the amount described in paragraph (1) and the 13    interest described in paragraph (2), except if a person 14    who has violated subsection (a) proves to the satisfaction 15    of the court that the act or omission was in good faith and 16    that the person had reasonable grounds for believing that 17    the act or omission was not a violation of subsection (a), 18    the court may, in the discretion of the court, reduce the 19    amount of the liability to the amount and interest 20    determined under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), 21    respectively.22    In addition, a court may order equitable relief as may be 23appropriate, including employment, reinstatement, promotion, 24and reinstatement of a contract for services.25    (c) An action to recover the damages or obtain equitable 26relief under subsection (a) may be maintained against any   HB3483- 37 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1person in any court on behalf of:2        (1) the aggrieved individual; or3        (2) the aggrieved individual or other individuals 4    similarly situated.5    (d) The court in an action shall, in addition to any 6judgment awarded to the covered individual, allow reasonable 7attorney's fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other 8costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.9    (e) The right under subsection (c) to bring an action by or 10on behalf of any individual shall terminate:11        (1) on the filing of a complaint by the Department in 12    an action in which restraint is sought of any further 13    delay in the payment of the amount described in paragraph 14    (1) of subsection (b) to the individual by the person 15    responsible under subsection (a) for the payment; or16        (2) on the filing of a complaint by the Department in 17    an action under subsection (f) in which a recovery is 18    sought of the damages described in paragraph (1) of 19    subsection (b) owing to the individual by the person 20    liable under subsection (a).21    (f) Actions brought by the Department.22        (1) The Department may bring an action in any court to 23    recover the damages described in paragraph (1) of 24    subsection (b).25        (2) Any sums recovered under paragraph (1) shall be 26    held in a special deposit account and shall be paid, on   HB3483- 38 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    order of the Department, directly to each individual 2    affected. Any sums not paid to an individual because of an 3    inability to do so within a period of 3 years shall be 4    deposited into the Fund.5        (3) An action may be brought under this subsection not 6    later than 3 years after the date of the last event 7    constituting the alleged violation for which the action is 8    brought.9        (4) An action brought by the Department under this 10    subsection shall be considered to be commenced on the date 11    when the complaint is filed.12        (5) The Department may bring an action to restrain 13    violations of subsection (a), including the restraint of 14    any withholding of payment of wages, salary, employment 15    benefits, or other compensation, plus interest, found by 16    the court to be due to the individual, or to award other 17    equitable relief as may be appropriate, including 18    employment, reinstatement, and promotion.19    (g) Actions brought by an interested party. 20        (1) Upon a reasonable belief that an employer, day and 21    temporary labor service agency, employee organization, or 22    other person covered by this Act committed a violation of 23    subsection (a), an interested party may initiate a civil 24    action in the county where the alleged offenses occurred 25    or where any party to the action resides, asserting that a 26    violation of subsection (a) has occurred, subject to the   HB3483- 39 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    following:2            (A) the interested party submits to the Department 3        a complaint describing the violation and naming the 4        employer or entity alleged to have violated subsection 5        (a); 6            (B) the Department sends notice of the complaint 7        to the named parties alleged to have violated 8        subsection (a), the person or persons alleged to have 9        been aggrieved, and the interested party, and provides 10        the named parties the option to contest the alleged 11        violation or cure the alleged violation; and12            (C) the named parties contest or cure the 13        violation within 30 days after receipt of the notice 14        of the complaint or, if the named party does not 15        respond within 30 days, the Department issues a notice 16        of right to sue to the interested party in accordance 17        with paragraph (2).18        (2) The Department shall issue a notice of right to 19    sue to the interested party, if one or more of the 20    following has occurred:21            (A) the named party or parties have cured the 22        alleged violation to the satisfaction of the Director;23            (B) the Director has determined that the 24        allegation is unjustified or that the Department does 25        not have jurisdiction over the matter or the parties; 26        or  HB3483- 40 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1            (C) the Director has determined that the 2        allegation is justified or has not made a 3        determination and has decided not to exercise 4        jurisdiction over the matter or has concluded 5        administrative enforcement of the matter. 6        (3) If, within 180 days after service of the notice of 7    complaint to the parties, the Department has not (i) 8    resolved the contest and cure period, (ii) with the mutual 9    agreement of the parties, extended the time for the named 10    party to cure the violation and resolve the complaint, or 11    (iii) issued a right to sue letter, the interested party 12    may initiate a civil action for penalties. The parties may 13    extend the 180-day period by mutual agreement. The 14    limitations period for the interested party to bring an 15    action for the alleged violation of the subsection (a) 16    shall be tolled for the 180-day period and for the period 17    of any mutually agreed extensions. At the end of the 18    180-day period, or any mutually agreed extensions, the 19    Department shall issue a right to sue letter to the 20    interested party.21        (4) Any claim or action filed under this Section must 22    be made within 3 years of the alleged conduct resulting in 23    the complaint plus any period for which the limitations 24    period has been tolled. 25        (5) In an action brought under this Section, an 26    interested party may recover against the employer, day and   HB3483- 41 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    temporary labor service agency, employee organization, or 2    other person any statutory penalties provided for in 3    Section 70 and injunctive relief. An interested party who 4    prevails in a civil action shall receive 10% of any 5    statutory penalties assessed plus any attorney's fees and 6    expenses in bringing the action. The remaining 90% of any 7    statutory penalties assessed shall be deposited into the 8    Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program Fund and 9    shall be used exclusively for the purposes of 10    administration of this Act. 11    Section 70. Penalties. 12    (a) A person who makes a false statement or 13representation, knowing it to be false, to increase any paid 14family and medical leave benefit during a period of paid 15family and medical leave, either for himself or herself or for 16any other person, shall be liable for a civil penalty of $250 17to be paid to the Department. Each false statement or 18representation shall constitute a separate offense. Upon 19refusal to pay the civil penalty, the civil penalty shall be 20recovered in a civil action by the Attorney General on behalf 21of the Department in the name of the State of Illinois. If, in 22any case in which liability for the payment of a civil penalty 23has been determined, any person who has received any benefits 24under this Act by reason of the making of false statements or 25representations shall not be entitled to any benefits under   HB3483- 42 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1this Act for any leave occurring prior to the time he or she 2has discharged his or her liability to pay the civil penalty.3    (b) A person, employing unit, employer, or entity that 4willfully violates any provision of this Act or any rule 5adopted under this Act for which a civil penalty is neither 6prescribed in this Act nor provided by any other applicable 7law shall be subject to a civil penalty of $2,500, and an 8additional civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each month 9during which the violation continues, to be paid to the 10Department. Upon the refusal to pay the civil penalty, the 11civil penalty shall be recovered in a civil action by the 12Attorney General on behalf of the Department in the name of the 13State of Illinois. 14    Section 75. Leave and employment protection. 15    (a) During any consecutive, intermittent, or medically 16necessary periodic leave period in which an employee receives 17paid family and medical leave benefits under this Act, the 18employee is entitled to paid family and medical leave and, at 19the established ending date of leave, to be restored to a 20position of employment with the employer from whom leave was 21taken as provided under subsection (b). The requirements of 22this subsection may be waived in a bona fide collective 23bargaining agreement covering individuals in the construction 24industry.25    (b) Except as provided in subsection (f), an employee who   HB3483- 43 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1receives family and medical leave benefits under this Act for 2the intended purpose of the paid family and medical leave is 3entitled, on return from the leave:4        (1) to be restored by the employer to the position of 5    employment held by the employee when the paid family and 6    medical leave commenced; or7        (2) to be restored to an equivalent position with 8    equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other terms and 9    conditions of employment at the employee's workplace 10    immediately prior to when the paid family and medical 11    leave commenced.12    (c) The taking of paid family and medical leave under this 13Act may not result in the loss of any employment benefits 14accrued before the date on which the paid family and medical 15leave commenced.16    (d) Nothing in this Section entitles a restored employee 17to:18        (1) the accrual of any seniority or employment 19    benefits during any period of paid family and medical 20    leave; or21        (2) any right, benefit, or position of employment 22    other than any right, benefit, or position to which the 23    employee would have been entitled to if the employee not 24    taken the paid family and medical leave.25    (e) During any period an employee takes paid family and 26medical leave under this Act, if the employer provides   HB3483- 44 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1insurance for employees, the employer shall maintain coverage 2for the employee and any family member under any group health 3plan for the duration of leave at no less than the level and 4conditions of coverage that would have been provided if the 5employee had not taken the leave. If the employer and employee 6share the cost of the existing health benefits, the employee 7may remain responsible for the employee's share of the cost. 8However, the employer shall notify the employee that the 9employee is still responsible for paying the employee's share 10of the cost of the health care coverage, if any. The 11requirements of this subsection may be waived in a bona fide 12collective bargaining agreement covering individuals in the 13construction industry where the collective bargaining 14agreement requires employers to contribute to a multi-employer 15health plan.16    (f) An employer may not require, as a condition of 17employment or complying with this Act, that the employee 18search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours 19during which the employee takes leave under this Act. 20    Section 80. Notice to employer. 21    (a) If the necessity for paid family and medical leave is 22foreseeable, the employee shall provide the employer with not 23less than 30 days' notice, before the date the leave is to 24begin, of the employee's intention to take leave.25    (b) If the necessity for paid family and medical leave is   HB3483- 45 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1not foreseeable or requires leave to begin in less than 30 2days, the employee shall provide notice as is practicable. 3    Section 85. Employment by the same employer. If spouses 4who are entitled to leave under this Act are employed by the 5same employer and that employer has fewer than 10 employees, 6the employer may require that the spouses not take more than 6 7weeks of leave concurrently, with the following exceptions:8        (1) the employee is seeking to take leave under this 9    Act for his or her own serious medical condition; 10        (2) the employee is seeking to take leave under this 11    Act to participate in the providing of care to a spouse who 12    is employed by the same employer; or13        (3) the employee is seeking to take leave under this 14    Act to participate in the providing of care to a child the 15    employee shares with his or her spouse who is employed by 16    the same employer. 17    Section 90. Coordination of leave. Paid family and medical 18leave taken under this Act must be taken concurrently with any 19leave taken under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 201993 or a collective bargaining agreement. The employer must 21give its employees written notice of this requirement. 22    Section 95. Rules. The Department shall adopt any rules 23necessary to implement the provisions of this Act.   HB3483- 46 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    Section 100. Authority to enter into interagency 2agreements. 3    (a) The Department may enter into interagency agreements 4with other State agencies for the initial administration of 5the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Program.6    (b) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2033. 7    Section 105. Pregnancy; effect of other State law. No 8individual shall suffer any repercussion under any Illinois 9law, rule, or policy for any decisions the covered individual 10is authorized to make under this Act regarding leave related 11to pregnancy, recovery from childbirth, care of a child, or 12related conditions. 13    Section 110. Program benefits; taxable income. Paid family 14and medical leave benefits received under the provisions of 15this Act shall not be taxed by the State of Illinois under the 16Illinois Income Tax Act or in any other manner and shall not be 17taxed by any unit of government within Illinois. 18    Section 115. Advance payment of premiums for State 19employees.20    (a) On the effective date of this Act, or as soon as 21possible thereafter, the State Comptroller and the State 22Treasurer, at the direction of the Governor, shall transfer   HB3483- 47 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1funds from the General Revenue Fund to the Paid Family and 2Medical Leave Insurance Program Fund. The money is an advance 3payment of premiums for State employee coverage that the State 4is required to pay under Section 35. The advance payment of 5premiums shall be used by the Department for the initial 6administration of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance 7Program.8    (b) On or before June 30, 2026, the Division shall 9determine the manner in which the State will receive a credit 10for the advance payment of premiums it has paid under this 11Section for premiums it is required to pay under Section 35. 12    (c) On January 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each year 13thereafter, the Director shall submit a report of the amount 14of remaining credit the State can receive for premiums it is 15required to pay to the State Treasurer, the Director of the 16Office of Management and Budget, the Director of Central 17Management Services, and the General Assembly. 18    (d) The advance payment of premiums by the State under 19this Section shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a 20debt, or a liability of the State. 21    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 22changing Section 7 as follows: 23    (5 ILCS 140/7)24    Sec. 7. Exemptions.   HB3483- 48 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 2record that contains information that is exempt from 3disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 4that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 5to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 6shall make the remaining information available for inspection 7and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 8be exempt from inspection and copying: 9        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 10    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 11    regulations implementing federal or State law. 12        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 13    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 14    or a court order. 15        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 16    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 17    specifically designed to provide information to one or 18    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 19    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 20        (c) Personal information contained within public 21    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 22    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 23    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 24    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 25    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 26    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a   HB3483- 49 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 2    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 3    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 4    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 5    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 6    privacy. 7        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 8    created in the course of administrative enforcement 9    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 10    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 11    extent that disclosure would: 12            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 13        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 14        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 15        agency that is the recipient of the request; 16            (ii) interfere with active administrative 17        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 18        that is the recipient of the request; 19            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 20        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 21        hearing; 22            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 23        confidential source, confidential information 24        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 25        who file complaints with or provide information to 26        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or   HB3483- 50 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1        penal agencies; except that the identities of 2        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 3        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 4        local government, except when disclosure would 5        interfere with an active criminal investigation 6        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 7        request; 8            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 9        techniques other than those generally used and known 10        or disclose internal documents of correctional 11        agencies related to detection, observation, or 12        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 13        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 14        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 15        request; 16            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 17        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 18            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 19        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 20        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 21    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 22    record management system if the law enforcement agency 23    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 24    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 25    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 26    access to the record through the shared electronic record   HB3483- 51 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    management system. 2        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 3    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 4    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 5    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 6    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 7    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 8    Board. 9        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 10    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 11    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 12        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 13    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 14        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 15    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 17    materials are available in the library of the correctional 18    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 19    confined. 20        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 21    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 22    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 23    materials include records from staff members' personnel 24    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 25    information. 26        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the   HB3483- 52 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 2    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 3    through an administrative request to the Department of 4    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 5    Mental Health. 6        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 7    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 8    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 9    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 10    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 11    institution or facility.12        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 13    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 14    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 15    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 16    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 17    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 18    or school address, work telephone number, social security 19    number, or any other identifying information, except as 20    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 21    or claim. 22        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 23    requested by a person committed to the Department of 24    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 25    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 26    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and   HB3483- 53 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 2    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 3    claim. 4        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 5    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 6    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 7    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 8    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 9    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 10    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 11    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 12    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 13        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 14    information obtained from a person or business where the 15    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 16    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 17    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 18    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 19    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 20    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 21    requested.22        The information included under this exemption includes 23    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 24    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 25    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 26    company within the investment portfolio of a private   HB3483- 54 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 2    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 3    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 4    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 5    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 6    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 7    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 8    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 9    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 10    privately held company may cause competitive harm.11        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 12    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 13    to disclosure. 14        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 15    agreement, including information which if it were 16    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 17    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 18    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 19    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 20    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 21    award or final selection is made. 22        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 23    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 24    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 25    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 26    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in   HB3483- 55 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 2    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 3    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 4    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 5    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 6    legal rights of the general public. 7        (j) The following information pertaining to 8    educational matters:9            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 10        examination data used to administer an academic 11        examination; 12            (ii) information received by a primary or 13        secondary school, college, or university under its 14        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 15        their academic peers; 16            (iii) information concerning a school or 17        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 18        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 19        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and20            (iv) course materials or research materials used 21        by faculty members. 22        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 23    submissions, and other construction related technical 24    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 25    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 26    projects constructed or developed with public funds,   HB3483- 56 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    including, but not limited to, power generating and 2    distribution stations and other transmission and 3    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 4    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 5    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 6    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 7    security. 8        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 9    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 10    public body makes the minutes available to the public 11    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 12        (m) Communications between a public body and an 13    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 14    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 15    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 16    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 17    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 18    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 19    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 20        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 21    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 22    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 23    cases in which discipline is imposed. 24        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 25    with automated data processing operations, including, but 26    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer   HB3483- 57 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 2    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 3    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 4    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 5    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 6    security of the system or its data or the security of 7    materials exempt under this Section. 8        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 9    between public bodies and their employees or 10    representatives, except that any final contract or 11    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 12        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 13    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 14    an applicant for a license or employment. 15        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 16    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 17    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 18    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 19    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 20    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 21    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 22    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 23    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 24    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 25    until a sale is consummated. 26        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records   HB3483- 58 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 2    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 3    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 4    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 5    intergovernmental risk management association or 6    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 7    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 8        (t) Information contained in or related to 9    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 10    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 11    for the regulation or supervision of financial 12    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 13    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 14    law. 15        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 16    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 17    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 18    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 19    Electronic Transactions Act. 20        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 21    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 22    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 23    community's population or systems, facilities, or 24    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 25    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 26    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies,   HB3483- 59 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 2    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 3    include such things as details pertaining to the 4    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 5    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 6    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 7        (w) (Blank). 8        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 9    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 10    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 11    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 12    Illinois Power Agency. 13        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 14    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 15    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 16    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 17    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 18    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 19    Commission. 20        (z) Information about students exempted from 21    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 22    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 23    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 24    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 25    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 26        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted   HB3483- 60 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 2        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 3    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 4    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 5    Mortality Review Team Act. 6        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 7    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 8    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 9    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.10        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 11    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 12    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 13    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 14        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 15    information of persons who are minors and are also 16    participants and registrants in programs of park 17    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 18    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 19    associations.20        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 21    information of participants and registrants in programs of 22    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 23    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 24    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 25    minors.26        (gg) Confidential information described in Section   HB3483- 61 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 2    2012. 3        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 4    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 5    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 6    School Code and any information contained in that report. 7        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 8    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 9    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 10    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 11    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 12    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 13    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 14    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 15    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 16    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 17    Corrections.18        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 19    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 21    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 22    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 23    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 24    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 25    of a governmental entity or a person. 26        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat   HB3483- 62 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 2    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 3    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 4    the procedure.5        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 6    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 7    Confidential Reporting Act. 8        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 9    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 10    Act. 11        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 12    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 13        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 14    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 15    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 16    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 17    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 18    Act.19        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 20    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 21        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 22    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 23        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 24    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 25    protected health information, including demographic 26    information, that may be contained within or extracted   HB3483- 63 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 2    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 3    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 4    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 5    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 6    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 7    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 8    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 9    160.103. 10        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 11    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 12    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 13    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 14        (uu) Confidential information described in subsection 15    (e) of Section 15 of the Paid Family and Medical Leave 16    Insurance Program Act. 17    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 18Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 19prior to disclosure under this Act. 20    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 21public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 22agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 23behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 24governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 25Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 26for purposes of this Act.   HB3483- 64 -LRB104 11016 SPS 21098 b1    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 2information or limit the availability of records to the 3public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 4in this Act. 5(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 6102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 71-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 8eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 9103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 108-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 11eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 13Section 5.1030 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)15    Sec. 5.1030. The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance 16Program Fund. 17    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.